Mississippi, session 2026, SB2940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Mental Health for the purpose of defraying costs associated with additional ID/DD Home- and Community-Based Waiver slots and additional staff to support such slots for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027..... ............................................... $ 36,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that Thirty-five Million Dollars ($35,000,000.00) is provided as an increase over and above the Fiscal Year 2024 appropriation level of funding for one thousand seven hundred fifty (1,750) ID/DD Home- and Community-Based Waiver slots for a total of four thousand six hundred (4,600) slots in the ID/DD Home- and Community-Based Waiver program. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) is provided as an increase over and above the Fiscal Year 2024 appropriation level of funding for additional staff to support the one thousand seven hundred fifty (1,750) new slots in the ID/DD Home- and Community-Based Waiver program. SECTION 4.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.